Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-208.01
Bonus point, defined.

Bonus point means a point or points accrued by an applicant for preference in a random permit drawing in which the number of points determines the number of entries in the permit drawing.

Laws 2020, LB287, § 3.